Ohio, session 136, HB378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4503.717 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 4503.717. (A) The owner or lessee of any passenger 6
car, noncommercial motor vehicle, motorcycle, recreational 7
vehicle, trailer, or other vehicle of a class approved by the 8
registrar of motor vehicles may apply to the registrar for the 9
registration of the vehicle and issuance of "Blue Knights 10
L.E.M.C." license plates. The application may be combined with a 11
request for a special reserved license plate under section 12
4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of the 13
completed application and compliance by the applicant with 14
divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the registrar shall issue 15
to the applicant the appropriate vehicle registration and a set 16
of "Blue Knights L.E.M.C." license plates and a validation 17
sticker, or a validation sticker alone when required by section 18
4503.191 of the Revised Code. 19

H. B. No. 378 Page 2
As Introduced
In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily 20
inscribed on the license plates, "Blue Knights L.E.M.C." license 21
plates shall display an appropriate logo and words that are 22
selected by representatives of the Blue Knights International 23
Law Enforcement Motorcycle Club and approved by the registrar. 24
"Blue Knights L.E.M.C." license plates shall display county 25
identification stickers that identify the county of registration 26
as required under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code. 27
(B) "Blue Knights L.E.M.C." license plates and a 28
validation sticker, or validation sticker alone, shall be issued 29
upon receipt of an application for registration of a motor 30
vehicle under this section; payment of the regular license tax 31
as prescribed under section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, any 32
applicable motor vehicle license tax levied under Chapter 4504. 33
of the Revised Code, any applicable additional fee prescribed by 34
section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code, and an 35
additional administrative fee of ten dollars; and compliance 36
with all other applicable laws relating to the registration of 37
motor vehicles. 38
(C) The registrar shall deposit the administrative fee of 39
ten dollars, the purpose of which is to compensate the bureau of 40
motor vehicles for additional services required in the issuing 41
of "Blue Knights L.E.M.C." license plates, into the state 42
treasury to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes 43
fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. 44